Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 1

General Provisions

9-9-101. State funding board.

The state funding board shall be composed of the governor, the commissioner of finance and administration, the state treasurer, the secretary of state, and the comptroller of the treasury. The governor shall serve as the chair, and the comptroller shall serve as the vice chair and secretary. The board has the power to prescribe its rules and regulations and govern its meetings and procedures as it may deem advisable. A majority of the board constitutes a quorum and the confirming vote of at least three (3) members of the board is required.

Acts 1927, ch. 1, § 4; 1929, ch. 125, § 1; 1929 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 9, § 1; Code 1932, § 1800; Acts 1937, ch. 33, § 45; 1937, ch. 258, § 1; 1939, ch. 11, § 29; 1941, ch. 7, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, §§ 255.47, 1800.1 (Williams, §§ 255.48, 1800.1); Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 8; 1959, ch. 155, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; Acts 1976, ch. 806, § 1(46); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-901; Acts 2010, ch. 982, § 1; 2013, ch. 176, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. The state funding board, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2024. See §§4-29-112,4-29-245.

Acts 2013, ch. 176, § 1 provided that the act, which deleted subsection (b), shall be known and may be cited as the “Hawkins-Wilson Act.”

Acts 2013, ch. 176, § 11 provided that nothing in the act, which deleted subsection (b), shall be construed so as to impair the obligation of any contract made by the state of Tennessee upon any bond of the state issued under title 9, chapter 9 outstanding as of July 1, 2013.

Cross-References. Age discrimination prohibited for appointments to state boards and commissions, §4-1-403.

Bonds for aid of consolidating counties, §5-3-122.

Federal loans, approval by funding board, §4-4-116.

State funding board attached to office of the comptroller of the treasury, §4-3-306.

Law Reviews.

Financing Public Needs After Tax Reform (Jon G. Roach), 23 Tenn. B.J. 19 (1987).

Attorney General Opinions. In the event the general assembly does not enact an annual appropriations act, principal and interest on long-term general obligation bonds may still be paid, OAG 00-083, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 86 (5/4/00).

9-9-102. Maintenance of records on the condition of all debt obligations and payments.

The commissioner of finance and administration shall maintain, or cause to be maintained, records on the condition of all debt obligations described in §9-9-105(a) and of the payment of the principal of and premium, if any, and interest on such obligations.

Acts 1899, ch. 8, § 1; Shan., § 1068a2; Code 1932, § 1802; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 1802; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-903; Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 64; 2000, ch. 598, § 1; 2013, ch. 176, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 176, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Hawkins-Wilson Act.”

Acts 2013, ch. 176, § 11 provided that nothing in the act, which amended this section, shall be construed so as to impair the obligation of any contract made by the state of Tennessee upon any bond of the state issued under title 9, chapter 9 outstanding as of July 1, 2013.

9-9-103. Debt service payments.

There is hereby appropriated to the state funding board on a direct and continuing basis a sum sufficient for payment of debt service (principal, interest and premium, if any) on outstanding bonds and other debt obligations (including notes), amounts due on contracts or agreements authorized under this chapter, and necessary related expenses. The state funding board is authorized to make debt service payments on outstanding bonds and other debt obligations (including notes), and make payments due under contracts and agreements authorized under this chapter, and necessary related expenses, as provided in this section from any funds held in the state treasury not otherwise legally restricted, independent of an appropriation bill as contemplated by chapter 4, part 51 of this title.

Acts 1937, ch. 165, § 1 (Williams, § 1811.12); impl. am. Acts 1949, ch. 52, § 1; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-904; Acts 1998, ch. 582, § 7; 2001, ch. 264, § 1; 2013, ch. 176, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1998, ch. 582, § 11 provided that if any court of last resort should determine the tax levied by Acts 1997, ch. 316 to be invalid, then immediately upon the effective date of the court's order, the prior sections amended by Acts 1998, ch. 582, §§ 7-10 shall be revived as in effect prior to January 1, 1998, and the reference in Acts 1998, ch. 582, § 1 to §67-3-1303 shall be deleted and §67-3-904 shall be substituted instead.

Acts 1998, ch. 582, § 13 provided that the amendments by §§ 7-11 of that act apply retroactively to January 1, 1998.

Acts 2013, ch. 176, § 1 provided that the act, which deleted subsection (a), shall be known and may be cited as the “Hawkins-Wilson Act.”

Acts 2013, ch. 176, § 11 provided that nothing in the act, which deleted subsection (a), shall be construed so as to impair the obligation of any contract made by the state of Tennessee upon any bond of the state issued under title 9, chapter 9 outstanding as of July 1, 2013.

9-9-104. Pledge of revenues — Covenants for protection of bondholders.

For the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds of the state of Tennessee issued under this chapter outstanding as of July 1, 2013, there is hereby pledged the annual proceeds of a tax of not less than five cents (5¢) per gallon upon gasoline, the annual proceeds of the special tax on petroleum products provided for by § 67-3-203, one-half (½) of the annual proceeds of motor vehicle registration fees now or hereafter required to be paid to the state, and the entire annual proceeds of franchise taxes imposed by the franchise tax law, compiled in title 67, chapter 4, part 21. This pledge shall not extend to any bonds issued under this chapter after July 1, 2013.

As long as any bonds issued under this chapter that were outstanding as of July 1, 2013 remain outstanding, the state of Tennessee hereby covenants with the persons who now or may hereafter hold such bonds that it will not decrease by legislative action any of the fees or taxes that constitute the special revenues pledged by this section, or eliminate from the requirement to pay such fees or taxes any substance, motor vehicle or corporation on account of which the payment of such fees or taxes is now required, and that it will levy a tax of not less than five cents (5¢) per gallon upon gasoline or other motor vehicle fuel, unless the state funding board shall certify that all payments due the state funding board under this chapter have been made in full, that the state is not in default in the payment of any outstanding debt or in the payment of interest thereon, and that such fees and taxes at lower rates to be specified by the state funding board, in such year or years (not exceeding two (2) years), will be sufficient to provide funds adequate to meet all payments required to be made by the state funding board in such year or years, as well as to provide for the other obligations and expenses of the state for such year or years, to be defrayed therefrom, in which event the state of Tennessee shall be under no obligation to charge or levy in such year or years fees or taxes in excess of the rates so certified by the state funding board.

In no event shall the pledge and covenants set forth in this section extend past or be effective after June 30, 2033.

Acts 1937, ch. 165, § 13 (Williams, § 1811.24); impl. am. Acts 1949, ch. 52, § 1; modified; Acts 1977, ch. 3, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-905; Acts 1998, ch. 582, §§ 1, 8; 2013, ch. 176, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. For codification of Acts 1937, ch. 165, see the Session Law Disposition Tables in Volume 13 of the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Acts 1998, ch. 582, § 11 provided that if any court of last resort should determine the tax levied by Acts 1997, ch. 316 to be invalid, then immediately upon the effective date of the court's order, the prior sections amended by Acts 1998, ch. 582, §§ 7-10 shall be revived as in effect prior to January 1, 1998, and the reference in Acts 1998, ch. 582, § 1 to §67-3-1303 shall be deleted and §67-3-904 shall be substituted instead.

Acts 1998, ch. 582, § 13 provided that the amendments by §§ 7-11 of that act apply retroactively to January 1, 1998. Section 8, which amended this section, substituted “the special tax on petroleum products provided for in §67-3-1303” for “the volatile substances inspection fee” in the first sentence.

Acts 2013, ch. 176, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Hawkins-Wilson Act.”

Acts 2013, ch. 176, § 11 provided that nothing in the act, which amended this section, shall be construed so as to impair the obligation of any contract made by the state of Tennessee upon any bond of the state issued under title 9, chapter 9 outstanding as of July 1, 2013.

9-9-105. Bonds constitute direct state obligations — Debt obligations constitute a charge and lien — Satisfaction of debt service coverage test.

All bonds issued (and to be issued) under this chapter, all notes issued (and to be issued) in anticipation of such bonds, and all tax revenue anticipation notes issued (and to be issued) under this chapter shall constitute direct general obligations of the state of Tennessee for the payment of the principal of and premium, if any, and interest on which there is also pledged the full faith and credit of the state of Tennessee. Subject only to § 9-9-104(a), all such debt obligations shall constitute a charge and lien upon the entire fees, taxes and other revenues and funds allocated to the general fund, the debt service fund, and the highway fund; and, if necessary, upon the first such fees, taxes, revenues and funds thereafter received and allocated to such funds, except only such fees, taxes, revenues and funds as may be otherwise legally restricted.

The state of Tennessee hereby covenants with the persons who now or may hereafter hold any debt obligations described in § 9-9-105(a) that it will raise fees, taxes and other revenues sufficient, together with funds on hand derived from all sources, to pay the principal of and premium, if any, and interest on such obligations as and when due and payable.

The state of Tennessee hereby covenants with the persons who now or may hereafter hold any bonds issued under this chapter that no bonds shall be issued under this chapter after July 1, 2013, unless the following debt service coverage test is satisfied: the amount necessary to pay the maximum annual debt service payable in the then current or any future fiscal year, is not greater than ten percent (10%) of the amount of total state tax revenue allocated to the general fund, to the debt service fund, and to the highway fund for the immediately preceding fiscal year.

For purposes of satisfying this test, “state tax revenues” are defined as those taxes, licenses, fees, fines, and permits collected by the department of revenue and allocated to the general fund, the debt service fund, and the highway fund excluding the portion of those taxes shared with local governments.

“Debt service”, for this purpose, means and includes principal of and interest on all outstanding bonds issued under this chapter and the bonds then proposed to be issued under this chapter, in the aggregate; provided, that in determining the outstanding bonds, there shall be excluded any outstanding bonds the payment of which has been fully provided for by funds or securities (including expected income therefrom), or both, set aside for that purpose.

Acts 1937, ch. 165, § 8 (Williams, § 1811.19); modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-906; Acts 1998, ch. 582, § 9; 2013, ch. 176, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. For codification of Acts 1937, ch. 165, see the Session Law Disposition Tables in Volume 13 of the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Acts 1998, ch. 582, § 11 provided that if any court of last resort should determine the tax levied by Acts 1997, ch. 316 to be invalid, then immediately upon the effective date of the court's order, the prior sections amended by Acts 1998, ch. 582, §§ 7-10 shall be revived as in effect prior to January 1, 1998, and the reference in Acts 1998, ch. 582, § 1 to §67-3-1303 shall be deleted and §67-3-904 shall be substituted instead.

Acts 1998, ch. 582, § 13 provided that the amendments by §§ 7-11 of that act apply retroactively to January 1, 1998.

Acts 2013, ch. 176, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Hawkins-Wilson Act.”

Acts 2013, ch. 176, § 11 provided that nothing in the act, which amended this section, shall be construed so as to impair the obligation of any contract made by the state of Tennessee upon any bond of the state issued under title 9, chapter 9 outstanding as of July 1, 2013.

9-9-106. Certification of amount necessary for payment of debt obligations.

The state funding board shall certify to the commissioner of finance and administration from time to time, but not less than annually, the amount necessary, together with funds on hand derived from all sources, to enable the board to provide for the payment of the principal of and premium, if any, and interest on all debt obligations described in §9-9-105(a) as and when the same shall become due and payable.

Acts 1937, ch. 165, § 8 (Williams, § 1811.19); impl. am. Acts 1949, ch. 52, § 1; modified; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 8; Acts 1973, ch. 336, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-907; Acts 2013, ch. 176, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. For codification of Acts 1937, ch. 165, see the Session Law Disposition Tables in Volume 13 of the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Acts 2013, ch. 176, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Hawkins-Wilson Act.”

Acts 2013, ch. 176, § 11 provided that nothing in the act, which amended this section, shall be construed so as to impair the obligation of any contract made by the state of Tennessee upon any bond of the state issued under title 9, chapter 9 outstanding as of July 1, 2013.

Cross-References. Parts of 1937 act left unrepealed, §1-2-106.

9-9-107. Payments by state funding board.

The state funding board shall provide for the payment of the principal of and premium, if any, and interest on all bonds issued under this chapter, all notes issued in anticipation of such bonds and all tax revenue anticipation notes issued under this chapter, amounts due on contracts or agreements described in §9-9-202(g) and (h) or other contracts or agreements relating to such debt obligations, and necessary related expenses incurred under this chapter as the same shall become due, out of the fees, taxes and other revenues and funds available for such purposes.

Acts 1937, ch. 165, §§ 9, 10 (Williams, §§ 1811.20, 1811.21); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-908; Acts 2000, ch. 598, § 2; 2013, ch. 176, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. For codification of Acts 1937, ch. 165, see the Session Law Disposition Tables in Volume 13 of the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Acts 2013, ch. 176, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Hawkins-Wilson Act.”

Acts 2013, ch. 176, § 11 provided that nothing in the act, which amended this section, shall be construed so as to impair the obligation of any contract made by the state of Tennessee upon any bond of the state issued under title 9, chapter 9 outstanding as of July 1, 2013.

9-9-108. State funding board's authority to deposit or transfer funds.

The state funding board may:

Deposit funds and revenues paid to it in the pooled investment fund authorized by § 9-4-603 or in a deposit account at a bank or trust company located within or without this state, which will give such security for such deposit of the kind and type now required by law for the deposit of other state funds; or

Transfer cash, pending its application to the payment of the principal of or interest on the outstanding obligations of the state, into a fiduciary or trust account with a bank or trust company located within or without this state, under terms as the board may require to ensure the safety of the funds.

Acts 1937, ch. 165, § 10 (Williams, § 1811.21); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-909; Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 65; 2000, ch. 598, § 2.

Cross-References. Collateral for deposit of state funds, title 9, ch. 4.

9-9-109. Custodian for securities.

The state funding board is expressly authorized to contract with a bank or trust company located within or without this state to act as a custodian for securities held by or for the benefit of the board, including collateral pledged pursuant to §9-9-108(1), under terms as the board may require to ensure the safety of the securities.

Acts 1937, ch. 165, § 3 (Williams, § 1811.14); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-910; Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 66; 2000, ch. 598, § 2.

Cross-References. Collateral for state funds, title 9, ch. 4.

9-9-110. Investment of cash not immediately required.

Cash in the hands of the state funding board not immediately required for the payment of the principal of or interest on outstanding obligations of the state and held as provided by §9-9-108 may be invested, in the board's discretion, in general obligation debt of the state of Tennessee or in any other obligations which are legal for the investment of funds of the state of Tennessee, with such yield and maturity as determined by the board after consultation with the state treasurer.

Acts 1937, ch. 165, § 11 (Williams, § 1811.22); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 8; Acts 1977, ch. 3, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-911; Acts 1985, ch. 118, § 67; 2000, ch. 598, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For codification of Acts 1937, ch. 165, see the Session Law Disposition Tables in Volume 13 of the Tennessee Code Annotated.

9-9-111. Vested rights of holders of debt obligations.

The holders of all debt obligations of the state of Tennessee described in §9-9-105(a) and all persons who may hereafter purchase such obligations shall have, and are hereby declared to have, a vested right in the performance of the covenants and pledges contained in this chapter, and the performance of the duties imposed upon any officer or agency of the state of Tennessee by or pursuant to this chapter may be enforced by the holder of any such obligation by appropriate proceedings; provided, that no such holders or purchasers of debt obligations issued after July 1, 2013, shall have any such rights with respect to §9-9-104.

Acts 1937, ch. 165, § 12 (Williams, § 1811.23); impl. am. Acts 1949, ch. 52, § 1; modified; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 8; Acts 1977, ch. 3, § 5; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-916; Acts 1998, ch. 582, § 10; 2013, ch. 176, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Section67-3-911 deemed this section to be applicable to and to include the special tax on petroleum products levied by §67-3-904, in lieu of the fees for inspection of volatile substances, so as not to effect a decrease by legislative action of the fees or taxes required by law to be paid at the time of enactment of the covenants.

For codification of Acts 1937, ch. 165, see the Session Law Disposition Tables in Volume 13 of the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Acts 1998, ch. 582, § 11 provided that if any court of last resort should determine the tax levied by Acts 1997, ch. 316 to be invalid, then immediately upon the effective date of the court's order, the prior sections amended by Acts 1998, ch. 582, §§ 7-10 shall be revived as in effect prior to January 1, 1998, and the reference in Acts 1998, ch. 582, § 1 to §67-3-1303 shall be deleted and §67-3-904 shall be substituted instead.

Acts 1998, ch. 582, § 13 provided that the amendments by §§ 7-11 of that act apply retroactively to January 1, 1998.

Acts 2013, ch. 176, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Hawkins-Wilson Act.”

Acts 2013, ch. 176, § 11 provided that nothing in the act, which amended this section, shall be construed so as to impair the obligation of any contract made by the state of Tennessee upon any bond of the state issued under title 9, chapter 9 outstanding as of July 1, 2013.

9-9-112. Exemption from taxes.

Principal of and interest on debt obligations issued under this chapter shall be exempt from taxation by the state, or by any county, municipality or taxing district of the state, except inheritance, transfer and estate taxes.

Acts 1937, ch. 165, § 15 (Williams, § 1811.26); 1977, ch. 3, § 6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-917; Acts 2013, ch. 176, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. For codification of Acts 1937, ch. 165, see the Session Law Disposition Tables in Volume 13 of the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Acts 2013, ch. 176, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Hawkins-Wilson Act.”

Acts 2013, ch. 176, § 11 provided that nothing in the act, which amended this section, shall be construed so as to impair the obligation of any contract made by the state of Tennessee upon any bond of the state issued under title 9, chapter 9 outstanding as of July 1, 2013.

Cross-References. Gift, estate and inheritance taxes, title 67, ch. 8, parts 1-5.

9-9-113. Bond term not to exceed lifetime of item financed — Tax exempt status.

No funds obtained through the sales of any bonds or notes of the state of Tennessee as provided for by this chapter shall be used to purchase or otherwise obtain any equipment, goods, or services, unless the equipment, goods, or services shall have a reasonably anticipated lifetime of use equal to or greater than the period of time for which the bonds or notes are issued and during which interest is payable for them. The “reasonably anticipated lifetime” within the meaning of this section shall be determined by the state building commission for projects under its jurisdiction and by other appropriate authority designated by the state funding board for all projects or programs not under the jurisdiction of the state building commission. Architectural, engineering, and other like services, which are determined by the state building commission or other appropriate authority designated by the state funding board to be a normal part of the project or program cost are not precluded by this section from funding from bond or note proceeds.

For the purpose of ensuring that the bonds, notes and other obligations issued after September 1, 1986, pursuant to this chapter maintain their tax-exempt status as may be provided by the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C.), as amended, no state officer or employee or user of a project or program shall authorize or allow any change, amendment or modification to a project or program financed or refinanced with the proceeds of such obligations which change, amendment or modification would affect the tax-exempt status of such obligations unless the change, amendment, or modification shall have received the prior approval of the office of state and local finance in the office of the comptroller of the treasury and the state funding board. Failure to receive such approval shall render any change, amendment, or modification null and void.

Acts 1977, ch. 222, § 1; T.C.A., § 9-929; Acts 1987, ch. 114, § 1; 2016, ch. 571, § 3.

Cross-References. Revenues to include proceeds of debt obligations, Tenn. Const., art. II, § 24.

9-9-114. Records of state obligations payments.

The secretary of the funding board shall keep, or cause to be kept, appropriate records concerning the payment of obligations of the state issued under this chapter, including information regarding items redeemed.

Acts 1957, ch. 297, § 1; T.C.A., § 9-925; Acts 2000, ch. 598, § 3.

9-9-115. Destruction of paid or cancelled bonds by paying agent.

The state of Tennessee, acting by resolution of the state funding board, may authorize and direct the paying agent for its bonds, notes and coupons, or other person in possession of its bonds, notes and coupons, to destroy all bonds, notes and coupons duly paid and cancelled.

Such bonds, notes and coupons duly paid and cancelled during any fiscal year beginning July 1 and ending on the following June 30 may be destroyed only after the fiscal audit of the appropriate state agency covering the fiscal year has been completed, and the department of audit will notify the state funding board that due account has been made of such duly paid and cancelled bonds, notes and coupons. The paying agent or other person in possession of the state's bonds, notes and coupons shall furnish a certified list of bonds, notes and coupons duly paid and cancelled, showing for each issue of bonds and notes: the bond, note and coupon number, the amount, the date paid, and such additional information as the state funding board by resolution may require.

This section shall be in addition to any other law. Where this section is in conflict with other law, this section shall prevail.

Acts 1977, ch. 273, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 9-930.

9-9-116. Technical advice — Expenses of carrying out chapter.

The state funding board is hereby authorized to procure such legal and technical advice, approving opinions and such financial assistance as it may consider necessary in connection with the carrying into effect of this chapter, and is also authorized to pay all necessary expenses, including costs of advertisement, printing bonds, certificates and coupons, publication of all releases, purchases of all necessary books and records, and all other incidental expenses as may be necessary. All such expenses, as well as the amount of any discount at which bonds issued under this chapter shall be sold, may be funded by bonds issued under this chapter and authorized heretofore or hereafter by the general assembly, to be issued by the funding board.

Acts 1937, ch. 165, § 14 (Williams, § 1811.25); 1977, ch. 3, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-918; Acts 1998, ch. 582, § 2.

9-9-117. State immunity preserved.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as either waiving the immunity of the state of Tennessee from suit or as extending its consent to be sued, notwithstanding any other portion or portions of this chapter to the contrary.

Acts 1937, ch. 165, § 15 (Williams, § 1811.26); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-919.

9-9-118. Authority to establish guidelines, rules and regulations.

The state funding board is authorized to establish guidelines, rules or regulations with respect to certain agreements and contracts facilitating the issuance and sale of debt by governmental entities established by private act, including contracts or agreements providing for liquidity and credit enhancement and reimbursement agreements relating thereto, interest rate swap or exchange agreements, agreements establishing interest rate floors or ceilings or both, other interest rate hedging agreements, and agreements with the purchaser of the debt when such agreements and contracts have been authorized under the private act subject to guidelines of the state funding board.

Acts 2002, ch. 818, § 1; T.C.A. §9-9-120.

Code Commission Notes.

This section was renumbered from §9-9-120 to §9-9-118 by authority of the Code Commission in 2020.